Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 5
GENERAL

42-7-501. Self-insurers.

Any person in whose name more than twenty-five motor vehicles are registered may qualify as a self-insurer by obtaining a certificate of self-insurance issued by the commissioner of insurance.

The commissioner of insurance may, in his or her discretion, upon the application of such person, issue a certificate of self-insurance when the commissioner of insurance is satisfied that such person is possessed and will continue to be possessed of ability to pay all judgments that may be obtained against such person. Upon not less than five days' notice and a hearing pursuant to such notice, the commissioner of insurance may, upon reasonable grounds, cancel a certificate of self-insurance. Failure to pay any judgment within thirty days after such judgment has become final shall constitute a reasonable ground for the cancellation of a certificate of self-insurance.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2488, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 1078, § 9, effective July 1.

42-7-502. Action against nonresident - reciprocity with other states.

All of the provisions of this article shall apply to any person who is not a resident of this state, and if such nonresident has been convicted of an offense which would require the suspension or revocation of the license of a resident, or if such nonresident has failed to satisfy a judgment within thirty days after the same became final which would require suspension or revocation under this article in respect to a resident, then in either such event such nonresident shall not operate any motor vehicle in this state, and the director shall not issue to such nonresident any license unless and until such nonresident gives proof of financial responsibility and satisfies any such judgment as is required with respect to a resident of this state.

The director shall transmit a certified copy of any record of any such conviction of a nonresident to the motor vehicle commissioner or state officer performing the functions of a commissioner in the state in which such nonresident resides and shall likewise forward to such officer a certified record of any unsatisfied judgment rendered against such nonresident which requires suspension of such nonresident's driving privileges in this state.

When a nonresident's operating privilege is suspended pursuant to section 42-7-301, the director shall transmit a certified copy of the record of such action to the official in charge of the issuance of licenses in the state in which such nonresident resides, if the law of such other state provides for action in relation thereto similar to that provided for in subsection (4) of this section.

Upon receipt of certification that the operating privilege of a resident of this state has been suspended or revoked in any such other state pursuant to a law providing for its suspension or revocation for failure to deposit security for the payment of judgments arising out of a motor vehicle accident or for failure to deposit security and furnish a statement evidencing that the resident is insured under an automobile liability insurance policy or bond or for failure to file and maintain proof of financial responsibility, under circumstances which would require the director to suspend a nonresident's operating privilege had the accident occurred in this state, the director shall suspend the license of such resident. Such suspension shall continue until such resident furnishes evidence of compliance with the law of such other state relating to the deposit of such security and until such resident furnishes the statement evidencing automobile liability insurance or a bond, or, as the case may be, files proof of financial responsibility, if required by such law.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2488, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

42-7-503. Director to furnish operating record.

The director shall, upon request, furnish any insurance carrier or any person or surety the record of any person subject to the provisions of this article, which record shall fully designate the motor vehicles, if any, registered in the name of such person, and if there is no record of any conviction of such person of a violation of any provision of any statute relating to the operation of a motor vehicle or of any injury or damage caused by such person as provided in this article, the director shall so certify. Such records shall be public records and subject to the provisions of section 42-1-206. No information required to be confidential by the provisions of section 24-72-204 (3.5)(a), C.R.S., shall be released by the director except as provided by that section. The director shall collect for each such certificate the sum of seventy-five cents.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2489, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

42-7-504. Matters not to be evidence in litigation.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, neither action taken by the director pursuant to this article, any judgment or court decision on appeal therefrom, the findings of the director in such action, nor the security deposited, statement evidencing automobile liability insurance or bond, or proof of financial responsibility filed as provided in this article shall be referred to nor be evidence of the negligence or due care of either party of an action at law to recover damages or in a criminal proceeding arising out of a motor vehicle accident. This section shall not apply to an action brought by the director to enforce the provisions of this article.

For the purposes of any civil trial, civil hearing, or arbitration held in relation to uninsured or underinsured motorist insurance coverage where the question of the existence of automobile liability insurance is an issue or when the amount of such insurance is an issue, the director shall issue, upon request, a certificate under seal. The certificate shall contain the motor vehicle operator's name, address, date of birth, and driver's license number; the date of the accident; and a statement indicating whether or not the records indicate that the owner or operator had in effect at the time of the accident an effective automobile liability policy and, if such a policy was in effect, the amount of coverage, the name of the insurer, and the number of the policy. Such certificate shall be prima facie evidence of the facts contained therein. The director shall collect for each such certificate an amount sufficient to defray the costs of administration of this section. Such amount shall be included as a cost of the action.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2490, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 464, § 6, effective August 4.

42-7-505. Forging ability to respond in damages.

Any person who forges or without authority signs any evidence of ability to respond in damages or who furnishes the director with a false statement evidencing that such person is insured under an automobile liability policy or bond, as required by the director in the administration of this article, is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars nor more than one thousand dollars, or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than ninety days, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2490, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

42-7-505.5. Motor carrier indemnity agreements void - choice of law for transportation contracts.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if any provision of a transportation contract purports to indemnify, defend, or hold harmless or has the effect of indemnifying, defending, or holding harmless the indemnitee from or against any liability for loss or damage resulting from its own negligence or intentional acts or omissions, then, to that extent, the provision is hereby declared contrary to public policy and is therefore void.

Notwithstanding any contractual provision to the contrary, the laws of the state of Colorado apply to every transportation contract executed or renewed, or under which services are performed, within the state of Colorado.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire section added, (HB 14-1065), ch. 63, p. 284, § 2, effective March 24.

42-7-506. Surrender of license.

Any person whose license has been suspended as provided in this article and has not been reinstated shall immediately return such license held by such person to the director. Any person willfully failing to comply with this requirement is guilty of a misdemeanor.

The director is authorized to take possession of any license upon the suspension thereof under the provisions of this article or to direct any peace officer to take possession thereof and to return the same to the office of the director.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2490, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

42-7-507. Penalty.

Any person who violates any provision of this article for which another penalty is not prescribed by law is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars nor more than one thousand dollars, or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than ninety days, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2491, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

42-7-508. No repeal of motor vehicle laws.

This article shall in no respect be considered as a repeal of the provisions of the state motor vehicle laws, but shall be construed as supplemental thereto.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2491, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

42-7-509. Article does not prevent other process.

This article shall not be construed to prevent the plaintiff in any action at law from relying for security upon the other processes provided by law.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2491, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

42-7-510. Insurance or bond required.

An owner of a truck that is subject to the registration fee imposed pursuant to section 42-3-306 (5)(b) or (7) and that is not subject to article 10.1 of title 40, C.R.S., before operating or permitting the operation of the vehicle upon a public highway in this state, shall have in each vehicle a motor vehicle liability policy or a certificate evidencing the policy issued by an insurance carrier or insurer authorized to do business in Colorado, or a copy of a valid certificate of self-insurance issued pursuant to section 10-4-624, C.R.S., or a surety bond issued by a company authorized to do a surety business in Colorado in the sum of fifty thousand dollars for damages to property of others; the sum of one hundred thousand dollars for damages for or on account of bodily injury or death of one person as a result of any one accident; and, subject to such limit as to one person, the sum of three hundred thousand dollars for or on account of bodily injury to or death of all persons as a result of any one accident.

Every owner of a motor vehicle designed and used for the nonemergency transportation of individuals with disabilities as defined in paragraph (b) of this subsection (2), before operating or permitting the operation of such vehicle upon any public highway in this state, shall file with the department a certificate evidencing a motor vehicle liability insurance policy issued by an insurance carrier or insurer authorized to do business in the state of Colorado or a surety bond issued by a company authorized to do a surety business in the state of Colorado with a minimum sum of fifty thousand dollars for damages to property of others; a minimum sum of one hundred thousand dollars for damages for or on account of bodily injury or death of one person as a result of any one accident; and, subject to such limit as to one person, a minimum sum of three hundred thousand dollars for or on account of bodily injury to or death of all persons as a result of any one accident.

As used in this subsection (2), a "motor vehicle designed and used for the nonemergency transportation of individuals with disabilities" means any motor vehicle designed to facilitate the loading of individuals with physical disabilities confined to a wheelchair except vehicles owned by the United States government, vehicles owned and operated by any special transportation district, or privately owned vehicles when such privately owned vehicles are used by the owner to transport the owner or members of the owner's family who are confined to a wheelchair.

Any person who violates any provision of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished according to the provisions of section 42-7-507. If any violation of this section is committed on behalf of a partnership or corporation, any director, officer, partner, or high managerial agent thereof who authorized, ordered, permitted, or otherwise participated in, by commission or omission, such violation is also guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished according to the provisions of section 42-7-507.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2491, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(1) amended, p. 961, § 23, effective May 25; (1) amended, p. 1211, § 26, effective May 31.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 907, § 36, effective May 21.

L. 2005:

(1) amended, p. 1179, § 21, effective August 8.

L. 2010:

(1) amended, (HB 10-1167), ch. 125, p. 417, § 8, effective April 15; (1) amended, (SB 10-212), ch. 412, p. 2039, § 20, effective July 1.

L. 2011:

(1) amended, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 426, § 28, effective August 10.